Massachusetts, session 194th, S285.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8G of Chapter 26 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
new paragraph:-
Section 8G. There shall be in the division of occupational licensure an auto damage
appraiser licensing board, hereinafter called the board, consisting of seven persons. The governor
shall appoint two members who shall be affiliated with the auto body repair industry and two
members who shall be affiliated with insurance companies writing casualty insurance within the
commonwealth. The attorney general shall appoint one representative of their office and shall
appoint one additional person, unaffiliated with their office, an auto body shop or an insurance
company, to represent consumers. The commissioner of the division of occupational licensure
of 2

shall appoint one person who shall not be affiliated with either the auto body industry or the
insurance industry and who shall be the chair of the board. No member shall serve for more than
2 consecutive and complete 3 year terms. As the term of the office of a member expires, a
successor shall be appointed in like manner for a term of 3 years. A vacancy on the board shall
be filled within 60 days from the date of the vacancy.
of 2